Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1324YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 86 Section 1. Section 232.96A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. The child is in need of treatment to cure or alleviate a 3 serious chemical dependency or mental illness or disorder, or 4 emotional damage as evidenced by severe anxiety, depression, 5 withdrawal, or behavioral health disorder that compromises 6 the childâs safety or causes untoward aggressive behavior 7 toward the childâs self or others in the household, and the 8 childâs parent, guardian, or custodian is unwilling to provide 9 such treatment or the parentâs, guardianâs, or custodianâs 10 efforts to secure needed treatment have been exhausted and 11 unsuccessful . 12 Sec. 2. Section 232.96A, subsections 11, 12, and 13, Code 13 2025, are amended by striking the subsections. 14 Sec. 3. Section 234.38, Code 2025, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 234.38 Foster care reimbursement rates. 17 The department shall make reimbursement payments directly 18 to foster parents for services provided to children pursuant 19 to section 234.6, subsection 1 , paragraph âeâ , subparagraph 20 (2), or section 234.35 . In any fiscal year, the reimbursement 21 rate shall be based upon sixty-five percent of the United 22 States department of agriculture estimate of the cost to raise 23 a child in the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal 24 year. The department may pay an additional stipend for a child 25 with special needs. The department shall review reimbursement 26 payment rates paid to foster parents under this section no less 27 than once every three years. The department shall adopt rules 28 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 29 Sec. 4. Section 600.8, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 3. a. The department, an agency, or a certified adoption 32 investigator shall conduct all investigations and reports 33 required under subsection 2 . 34 b. The department shall pay the costs of the preplacement 35 -1- LSB 1324YH (4) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 86 investigation under subsection 2 and the postplacement 1 investigation under subsection 4, up to a maximum of two 2 thousand dollars for the preplacement investigation and up 3 to a maximum of two thousand dollars for the postplacement 4 investigation. 5 c. The department shall not pay the costs of the 6 preplacement investigation or the postplacement investigation 7 as required under paragraph âbâ until a prospective adoption 8 petitioner has been approved under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , 9 subparagraph (3), by the person making the investigation. 10